Illinois, session 104th, HB2719.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 11-2 and 11-3 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-2)7    Sec. 11-2. Election precincts. 8    (a) The County Board in each county, except in counties 9having a population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over, shall, 10at its regular meeting in June or an adjourned meeting in July, 11divide its election precincts so that each precinct shall 12contain, as near as may be practicable, 1,200 registered 13voters who cast a ballot in person on the day of the most 14recent general election. Insofar as is practicable, each 15precinct shall be situated within a single congressional, 16legislative and representative district and in not more than 17one County Board district and one municipal ward. In order to 18situate each precinct within a single district or ward, the 19County Board shall change the boundaries of election precincts 20after each decennial census as soon as is practicable 21following the completion of congressional and legislative 22redistricting, except that, in 2021, the county board shall 23change the boundaries at a regular or special meeting within   HB2719- 2 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b160 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2102nd General Assembly. In determining whether a division of 3precincts should be made, the county board may anticipate 4increased voter registration in any precinct in which there is 5in progress new construction of dwelling units which will be 6occupied by voters more than 30 days before the next election. 7Each district shall be composed of contiguous territory in as 8compact form as can be for the convenience of the electors 9voting therein. The several county boards in establishing 10districts shall describe them by metes and bounds and number 11them.12    (b) The And so often thereafter as it shall appear by the 13number of votes cast at the general election held in November 14of any year, that any election district or undivided election 15precinct contains more than 1,200 registered voters, the 16County Board of the county in which an election the district or 17precinct or election precincts are located may be, shall at 18its regular meeting in June, or an adjourned meeting in July 19next, after such November election, redivide, consolidate, or 20readjust such election district or election precinct or 21election precincts, so that no district or election precinct 22shall contain more than the number of votes above specified in 23subsection (a).24    If for any reason the County Board fails in any year to 25redivide or readjust the election districts or election 26precinct, then the districts or precincts as then existing   HB2719- 3 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b1shall continue until the next regular June meeting of the 2County Board; at which regular June meeting or an adjourned 3meeting in July the County Board shall redivide or readjust 4the election districts or election precincts in manner as 5herein required. When at any meeting of the County Board any 6redivision, readjustment or change in name or number of 7election districts or election precincts is made by the County 8Board, the County Clerk shall immediately notify the State 9Board of Elections of such redivision, readjustment or change. 10The County Board in every case shall fix and establish the 11places for holding elections in its respective county and all 12elections shall be held at the places so fixed. The polling 13places shall in all cases be upon the ground floor in the front 14room, the entrance to which is in a highway or public street 15which is at least 40 feet wide, and is as near the center of 16the voting population of the precinct as is practicable, and 17for the convenience of the greatest number of electors to vote 18thereat; provided, however, where the County Board is unable 19to secure a suitable polling place within the boundaries of a 20precinct, it may select a polling place at the most 21conveniently located suitable place outside the precinct; but 22in no case shall an election be held in any room used or 23occupied as a saloon, dramshop, bowling alley or as a place of 24resort for idlers and disreputable persons, billiard hall or 25in any room connected therewith by doors or hallways. No 26person shall be permitted to vote at any election except at the   HB2719- 4 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b1polling place for the precinct in which he resides, except as 2otherwise provided in this Section or Article 19 of this Act. 3In counties having a population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or 4over the County Board shall divide its election precincts and 5shall fix and establish places for holding elections as 6hereinbefore provided during the month of January instead of 7at its regular meeting in June or at an adjourned meeting in 8July.9    However, in the event that additional divisions of 10election precincts are indicated after a division made by the 11County Board in the month of January, such additional 12divisions may be made by the County Board in counties having a 13population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over, at the regular 14meeting in June or at adjourned meeting in July. The county 15board of such county may divide or readjust precincts at any 16meeting of the county board when the voter registration in a 17precinct has increased beyond 1,800 registered voters and an 18election is scheduled before the next regular January or June 19meeting of the county board.20    (c) When in any city, village or incorporated town 21territory has been annexed thereto or disconnected therefrom, 22which annexation or disconnection becomes effective after 23election precincts or election districts have been established 24as above provided in this Section, the clerk of the 25municipality shall inform the county clerk thereof as provided 26in Section 4-21, 5-28.1, or 6-31.1, whichever is applicable.   HB2719- 5 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b1In the event that a regular meeting of the County Board is to 2be held after such notification and before any election, the 3County Board shall, at its next regular meeting establish new 4election precinct lines in affected territory. In the event 5that no regular meeting of the County Board is to be held 6before such election the county clerk shall, within 5 days 7after being so informed, call a special meeting of the county 8board on a day fixed by him not more than 20 days thereafter 9for the purpose of establishing election precincts or election 10districts in the affected territory for the ensuing elections.11    At any consolidated primary or consolidated election at 12which municipal officers are to be elected, and at any 13emergency referendum at which a public question relating to a 14municipality is to be voted on, notwithstanding any other 15provision of this Code, the election authority shall establish 16a polling place within such municipality, upon the request of 17the municipal council or board of trustees at least 60 days 18before the election and provided that the municipality 19provides a suitable polling place. To accomplish this purpose, 20the election authority may establish an election precinct 21constituting a single municipality of under 500 population for 22all elections, notwithstanding the minimum precinct size 23otherwise specified herein.24    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 25the above, when there are no more than 50 registered voters in 26a precinct who are entitled to vote in a local government or   HB2719- 6 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b1school district election, the election authority having 2jurisdiction over the precinct is authorized to reassign such 3voters to one or more polling places in adjacent precincts, 4within or without the election authority's jurisdiction, for 5that election. For the purposes of such local government or 6school district election only, the votes of the reassigned 7voters shall be tallied and canvassed as votes from the 8precinct of the polling place to which such voters have been 9reassigned. The election authority having jurisdiction over 10the precinct shall approve all administrative and polling 11place procedures. Such procedures shall take into account 12voter convenience, and ensure that the integrity of the 13election process is maintained and that the secrecy of the 14ballot is not violated.15    (e) Except in the event of a fire, flood or total loss of 16heat in a place fixed or established by any county board or 17election authority pursuant to this Section as a polling place 18for an election, no election authority shall change the 19location of a polling place so established for any precinct 20after notice of the place of holding the election for that 21precinct has been given as required under Article 12 unless 22the election authority notifies all registered voters in the 23precinct of the change in location by first class mail in 24sufficient time for such notice to be received by the 25registered voters in the precinct at least one day prior to the 26date of the election.  HB2719- 7 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b1    (f) The provisions of this Section apply to all precincts, 2including those where voting machines or electronic voting 3systems are used.4(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21.) 5    (10 ILCS 5/11-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-3)6    Sec. 11-3. Election precincts. 7    (a) It shall be the duty of the Board of Commissioners 8established by Article 6 of this Act, within 2 months after its 9first organization, to divide the city, village or 10incorporated town which may adopt or is operating under 11Article 6, into election precincts, each of which shall be 12situated within a single congressional, legislative and 13representative district insofar as is practicable and in not 14more than one County Board district and one municipal ward; in 15order to situate each precinct within a single district or 16ward, the Board of Election Commissioners shall change the 17boundaries of election precincts after each decennial census 18as soon as is practicable following the completion of 19congressional and legislative redistricting and such precincts 20shall contain as nearly as practicable 1,800 registered 21voters : (i) 1,200 registered voters if the precinct is located 22in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; or (ii) 231,800 registered voters if the precinct is located in a county 24with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants. 25    (b) Within 90 days after each presidential election, such   HB2719- 8 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b1board in a city with fewer than 500,000 inhabitants, village 2or incorporated town shall revise and rearrange such precincts 3on the basis of the votes cast at such election, making such 4precincts to contain, as near as practicable, 1,200 registered 5voters or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable. However, any 6apartment building in which more than 1,200 or 1,800 7registered voters, as applicable, reside may be made a single 8precinct even though the vote in such precinct exceeds 1,200 9or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable. 10    (c) Within 90 days after each presidential election, a 11board in a city with more than 500,000 inhabitants shall 12revise and rearrange such precincts on the basis of the votes 13cast at such election, making such precincts to contain, as 14near as practicable: (i) 1,200 registered voters if the 15precinct is located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 16inhabitants; or (ii) 1,800 registered voters if the precinct 17is located in a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants. 18However, any apartment building in which more than 1,200 19registered voters or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable, 20reside may be made a single precinct even though the vote in 21such precinct exceeds 1,200 or 1,800 registered voters, as 22applicable.23    (d) Immediately after the annexation of territory to the 24city, village or incorporated town becomes effective the Board 25of Election Commissioners shall revise and rearrange election 26precincts therein to include such annexed territory.  HB2719- 9 -LRB104 10558 SPS 20634 b1    (e) Provided, however, that at any election where but one 2candidate is nominated and is to be voted upon at any election 3held in any political subdivision of a city, village or 4incorporated town, the Board of Election Commissioners shall 5have the power in such political subdivision to determine the 6number of voting precincts to be established in such political 7subdivision at such election, without reference to the number 8of qualified voters therein. The precincts in each ward, 9village or incorporated town shall be numbered from one 10upwards, consecutively, with no omission.11    (f) The provisions of this Section apply to all precincts, 12including those where voting machines or electronic voting 13systems are used.14(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21.)